Louisiana, session 2026, HB938.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1863(11), 1868, and 1868.1 are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 22:1868.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1863. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following definitions apply:
* * *
(11) "Pharmacy benefit manager" has the same meaning as the term defined
in shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S. 22:1641 and includes any
person, either directly or indirectly, that provides one or more pharmacy benefit
Page 1 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
management services on behalf of an insurer or health plan, and any agent,
contractor, intermediary, affiliate, subsidiary, or related entity of such person who
facilitates, provides, directs, or oversees the provision of the pharmacy benefit
management services. "Pharmacy benefit manager" has the same meaning as
provided in R.S. 22:1641 and applies to any person or entity, and any wholly or
partially owned or controlled subsidiary, parent, or affiliate of such entity, that
directly or indirectly facilitates, provides, directs, manages, administers, or oversees
the provision of one or more pharmacy benefit management services. The
administration or management of a prescription benefits plan includes direct or
indirect participation at any stage in the negotiation or determination of prescription
drug pricing ultimately assessed to an insurer's or pharmacy benefit manager's client
health benefit plan.
* * *
§1868. Local pharmacy reimbursement; National Average Drug Acquisition Costs;
appeals
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a pharmacy benefit
manager shall reimburse any contracted pharmacist or local pharmacy for the
fulfillment of a drug prescription in an amount equal to the National Average Drug
Acquisition Cost for the dispensed prescription drug ingredient plus a dispensing fee
equivalent to the Louisiana Medicaid program dispensing fee. There shall be no
variance in a prescription drug manager's reimbursement for such fulfillment of a
drug prescription among the contracted pharmacists or local pharmacies in the
prescription drug manager's Louisiana book of business. If the National Average
Drug Acquisition Cost is not available at the time the prescription drug is
administered or dispensed, the pharmacy benefit manager shall reimburse the
pharmacy in an amount no less than the wholesale acquisition cost for the
prescription drug at the time the pharmacy acquired it.
A. B. No pharmacy benefit manager or person or entity acting on behalf of
a pharmacy benefit manager shall reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist in this state
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
an amount less than the acquisition cost for the covered drug, device, or service
amount specified in Subsection A of this Section. The provisions of this Section
shall apply only to reimbursement for a contracted pharmacist or local pharmacy.
B. C. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Acquisition cost" means the set of National Average Drug Acquisition
Costs, "NADAC," as calculated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
and reflected in the most recently released public file.
(2) "Adjustment factor" means a percentage-based change to the prescription
drug pricing benchmark, such as average wholesale price or national average drug
acquisition cost, specified in Subsection A of this Section, applied uniformly across
a class of drugs.
(3) "Claim payment error" means a pharmacy or pharmacist claim payment
amount that fails to reimburse at or above acquisition cost.
(4) "Reimbursement formula" means a prescription drug reimbursement
calculation involving an ingredient price, calculated based on a prescription drug
pricing benchmark plus an adjustment factor, and a professional dispensing fee.
C. D. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective
January 1, 2026, a pharmacy benefit manager shall meet all of the following
requirements for claims submitted by any local pharmacy to a pharmacy benefit
manager administering claims on behalf of a health plan, except for the Office of
Group Benefits:
(1) Adopt a reimbursement formula using either NADAC as the prescription
drug pricing benchmark or, with prior written approval by the commissioner, an
alternative prescription drug pricing benchmark that results in claim payment errors
that are both comparable to or less than NADAC in terms of frequency and smaller
than NADAC in terms of magnitude.
(2) Adopt a reimbursement formula using an adjustment factor that, based
on claims experience data available to the pharmacy benefit manager, is reasonably
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
expected to result in a claim payment error rate of no more than two percent per drug
as identified by its national drug code.
(3) (2) Adopt an appeal process for pharmacists to challenge claim payment
errors that, at a minimum, meets the following requirements:
(a) A network or local pharmacy contract executed by and between a
pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy located in Louisiana shall, at a minimum,
contain a provision expressly acknowledging that if a Louisiana pharmacy's
reimbursement for any covered drug or device is less than the pharmacy's acquisition
cost for that drug or device, the pharmacy has the right to appeal that reimbursement
and, if successful, receive additional payment so that the total reimbursement is
equal to the pharmacy's demonstrated acquisition cost. The pharmacy benefit
manager shall direct the pharmacy to the pharmacy benefit manager's electronic and
written appeal locations.
(b) Permit appeals to be filed for a period of fifteen days following the
applicable date of payment.
(c) If an appeal is filed with the pharmacy benefit manager, the pharmacy
must include a written invoice from the wholesaler that includes the drug name,
national drug code number, purchase date, and cost of the drug.
(d) If a claim payment error occurred, the pharmacy benefit manager shall
make an additional payment to the pharmacy to increase the reimbursement amount
to the acquisition cost.
(e) The pharmacy benefit manager shall individually notify all pharmacies
using the same customary supplier or wholesaler that a claim payment error occurred
and that the pharmacy may reverse and resubmit the claim to correct the claim
payment error. The pharmacy benefit manager shall make retroactive price
adjustments in the next payment cycle.
(f) If a pharmacy benefit manager determines that a claim payment error did
not occur, it shall provide the pharmacy or pharmacist with an explanation of why
it has upheld the payment, including a specific documentation of the acquisition cost
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
on the date of service. The explanation shall be provided electronically or in writing
through customary means of communication between the pharmacy benefit manager
and the pharmacy or pharmacist. The explanation shall also include a notice in at
least ten-point font stating that, if the pharmacy or pharmacist disagrees with the
decision, the pharmacy or pharmacist may file a complaint with the Department of
Insurance.
§1868.1. Pharmacy benefit manager income sources; rebate retention restrictions;
fee disclosure
A. A pharmacy benefit manager may negotiate, but shall not retain any
portion of rebates received from a drug manufacturer. All manufacturer rebates shall
be passed through to the plan sponsor as shared savings in the form of lower
premiums, reduced cost-sharing including reduced copays, coinsurance, or
deductibles for prescription drugs, or to provide broader drug coverage. The specific
allocation of rebates and how they are shared with plan members shall be identified
in the plan sponsor's plan design and contract terms. A pharmacy benefit manager
shall earn income exclusively from the following sources:
(1)(a) A flat dollar service fee. Assessment of a single, flat dollar service fee
for provision of pharmacy benefit management services charged on a per-person per-
month ("PMPM") or a per-prescription basis which shall cover all of the pharmacy
benefit manager's administrative, clinical, print, electronic, and related costs for
provision of prescription benefit management services to a client health benefit plan.
The service fee may vary among a pharmacy benefit manager's clients based on the
number of health benefit plan participants, clinical, and administrative services
provided, and other considerations.
(b) As used in this Section, "pharmacy benefit management services" means
negotiation of prescription drug prices, including manufacturer rebates, discounts,
and other price concessions, processing and payment of claims, conduct of drug
utilization reviews, administration of prior authorization requests, resolution of
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
patient appeals or grievances, contracting with network pharmacies, and any
additional services that may be defined by the commissioner.
(c) The single, flat dollar service fee for provision of pharmacy benefit
management services shall be expressed transparently in a written agreement
between the pharmacy benefit manager and its client health benefit plan.
(2) A flat dollar performance bonus. A flat dollar performance bonus
payment, which may be paid by a client health benefit plan to a pharmacy benefit
manager for meeting specified benchmarks in lowering the client health benefit
plan's aggregated overall drug spend over a specific period of time. A flat dollar
performance bonus payment, if agreed to mutually by the pharmacy benefit manager
and the client health benefit plan, shall be expressed transparently in a written
agreement between the parties.
B. All pharmacy benefit management fees shall be disclosed in writing and
set forth clearly in the contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and the
insurer or health plan. Throughout the course of providing agreed-upon prescription
benefit management services for client health benefit plans, a pharmacy benefit
manager shall not do any of the following:
(1) Derive any income based directly on prescription drug list price,
acquisition cost, average wholesale cost, or any other metric for prescription drug
pricing or fulfillment at any stage in the drug supply chain, including but not limited
to prescription drug markups, up-charging, spread pricing of any kind, manufacturer-
derived revenues of any sort, which include but shall not be limited to price
protection, group purchasing organization or "GPO" retained rebates or fees of any
kind, aggregator administrative or any other fees charged or collected, coupon
compensation and patient assistance compensation fees, retained discounts and
rebates, and other manufacturer payments, and any other arrangements on price of
prescription drugs. Any prohibited pharmacy benefit manager revenue that a
pharmacy benefit manager may receive during the course of a pharmacy benefit
manager's operations in service of its Louisiana client health plans shall be
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
considered prohibited income that the pharmacy benefit manager shall pass through
in its entirety to the pharmacy benefit manager's Louisiana health benefit plan clients
on a quarterly basis.
(2) Design a prescription drug formulary to favor a certain branded
pharmaceutical or biologic over a therapeutically equivalent generic or biosimilar,
unless the branded pharmaceutical or biologic has a lower net acquisition cost and
that lower cost is reflected in a lower out-of-pocket expense for consumers.
(3) Charge prescription drug consumers an out-of-pocket cost share that is
based on a prescription drug price greater than the pharmacy benefit manager's net
acquisition cost of the prescription drug.
C. A pharmacy benefit manager may negotiate, but shall not retain any
portion of rebates received from a drug manufacturer. All manufacturer rebates,
whether accrued to a pharmacy benefit manager, a pharmacy benefit manager's
affiliated GPO, or any other pharmacy benefit manager owned or affiliated entity,
shall be passed through to the pharmacy benefit manager's healthcare plan sponsor
client in the manner prescribed in Subsection B(1) of this Section as shared savings
in the form of lower premiums, reduced cost-sharing including reduced copays,
coinsurance, or deductibles for prescription drugs, or to provide broader drug
coverage. The specific allocation of rebates and how they are shared with plan
members shall be identified in the plan sponsor's plan design and contract terms.
"Rebates" means all rebates, discounts, and other price concessions, based on
utilization of a prescription drug and paid by the manufacturer or other party other
than an enrollee, directly or indirectly, to the pharmacy benefit manager. Rebates
include a reasonable estimate, as determined by the commissioner, of any volume-
based discount or other discounts.
C. D. On or before December thirty-first of each calendar year, each
pharmacy benefit manager shall certify under oath to the commissioner of insurance
that it has fully complied with the provisions of this Section for the prior calendar
year. The certification shall be signed by the chief executive officer or chief
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
financial officer of the pharmacy benefit manager and shall be subject to audit and
penalty for false statements.
D. E. Any violation of this Section shall be considered an unfair or deceptive
act or practice in the business of insurance and shall be subject to all enforcement
authority granted to the commissioner pursuant to this Title. In addition to any other
civil or criminal penalty authorized by law, a violation of this Section shall be
punishable by the department through a civil monetary penalty not to exceed five
thousand dollars per prescription drug claim, and is subject to any regulatory or
administrative remedy authorized by the commissioner.
E. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Pharmacy benefit management fee" means a fee paid by an insurer or
health plan to a pharmacy benefit manager for pharmacy benefit management
services provided.
(2) "Rebates" means all rebates, discounts, and other price concessions,
based on utilization of a prescription drug and paid by the manufacturer or other
party other than an enrollee, directly or indirectly, to the pharmacy benefit manager
after the claim has been adjudicated at the pharmacy. Rebates shall include a
reasonable estimate, as determined by the commissioner, of any volume-based
discount or other discounts.
§1868.2. Pharmacy benefit manager; client written agreement disclosure
A. A written agreement between a pharmacy benefit manager and its client
health benefit plan shall contain provisions requiring pharmacy benefit manager
disclosure to the client all of the following information:
(1) Comprehensive claims-level prescription drug pricing data.
(2) Corresponding pharmacy benefit manager reimbursement for claims to
all retail, mail-order, and specialty pharmacies.
(3) Comprehensive report of pharmacy benefit manager revenues derived
from prohibited sources, as provided in R.S. 22:1868.1(B), that must be passed
through to the client health benefit plan.
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
B. A written agreement between the pharmacy benefit manager and its client
health benefit plan shall require the pharmacy benefit manager to provide the
information required in Subsection A of this Section within thirty days of the date
of a client request or at negotiated regular intervals to enable the client health benefit
plan to determine the pharmacy benefit manager's compliance with the provisions
of this Subpart and its contract with the pharmacy benefit manager. A pharmacy
benefit manager shall not consider the information required by this Section to be
proprietary. The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide the information without
charge to the client.
C. Any pharmacy benefit manager that provides services to an insurer or a
health benefit plan that has a substantial number of Louisiana covered participant
lives shall provide the commissioner transparent access to the pharmacy benefit
manager's claims-level pricing, income, and pharmacy reimbursement data, as
required by this Section and R.S. 22:1869 and 1870, for the pharmacy benefit
manager's entire Louisiana book of business or for any part of it that may be
requested by the commissioner. The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide the
information, which shall not be considered by the pharmacy benefit manager to be
proprietary, without charge, within thirty days of the commissioner's request.
D. The commissioner shall adopt rules, as necessary, to enforce the
provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 39:1600.1(D)(1), (2)(introductory paragraph), (3), (4), (6), and
(11)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1600.1. Procurement of pharmacy benefit manager services by reverse auction
* * *
D. Contracts for pharmacy benefit manager services obtained through
reverse auction shall comply with the following:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the division of
administration may shall procure the services of a pharmacy benefit manager for the
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
administration of benefits under R.S. 42:801 et seq., in a transparent, online, and
dynamically competitive process and in the manner specified in this Section.
(2) The division of administration may shall procure the following products
and services as needed to implement this Section in accordance with this Chapter:
* * *
(3) If the division of administration exercises the authority provided for in
this Section, it The division of administration shall procure the technology platform
and related technology provider no later than four months in advance of the date
scheduled for completion of the PBM reverse auction.
(4) The division of administration shall not award a contract for procurement
of the technology platform and technology provider services to a vendor that is a
PBM or a vendor that is managed by or a subsidiary or affiliate of a PBM. In order
to prevent conflicts of interest, any consultant or advisor to the division or to the
office of group benefits who received remuneration for consultation or for any other
services related to the drafting or issuance of a request for proposals or the
procurement of pharmacy benefit manager services at any time between 2016 and
2026 shall not provide consultation to the division or to the office of group benefits
regarding the selection of the pharmacy benefit manager reverse auction technology
platform or provider or the conduct of the technology-enabled pharmacy benefit
manager reverse auction process.
* * *
(6)(a) With technical assistance and support provided by the technology
platform provider, the division of administration shall specify the terms of the
participant bidding agreement which shall not be modified except by specific consent
of the division of administration.
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
(b) The participant bidding agreement shall require qualified bidders in the
PBM reverse auction process, both full service PBMs and carveout service providers,
to comply with the terms and provisions of all PBM regulations in Title 22 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes.
(c) Qualified specialty carveout prescription drug service providers shall
compete with full service PBMs on the basis of price and any other appropriate
criteria for award of a specialty drug contract over multiple rounds of dynamically
competitive reverse auction bidding.
(d) Qualified generic carveout prescription drug service providers shall
compete with full service PBMs on the basis of price and any other appropriate
criteria for award of a generic drug contract over multiple rounds of dynamically
competitive reverse auction bidding.
(e) The PBM reverse auction process may result in award of multiple or
hybrid contracts to full service and carveout prescription service providers if such
award is determined to be of higher value to the state.
* * *
(11)(a) The processes and procedures set forth in this Part apply to group
benefit plans provided pursuant to R.S. 42:801 et seq., if the division of
administration elects to exercise its authority to conduct a PBM reverse auction in
accordance with this Section. This Section shall not apply in the case of a nonprofit,
nongovernmental health maintenance organization with respect to managed care
plans that provide a majority of covered professional services through a single
contracted medical group.
* * *
Section 3. Section 5 of Act No. 474 of the 2025 Regular Session is hereby repealed
in its entirety.
Section 4. Implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this Act shall begin
on October 1, 2026.
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1084 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 938
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.